California statutes. Elections Code
0036.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1002,
 1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2019, 2020

0036.06--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2014, 2015

0040.03--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3023

0040.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061,
 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024

0045.03--the following census blocks:

1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 2002, 2007, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2022

0061.02--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021

0072.01--the following census blocks:

1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014

0072.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005

0073.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009

0073.08--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016,
 2017, 2018

0078.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1037, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1056, 1057, 1060, 1068, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4018, 4019, 4020

0079.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027

0083.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5021, 5022

0083.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3009, 3012, 3015

0084.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011

0084.06--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015

0086.01--the following census blocks:

2022, 3013

0086.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1003, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2033, 2034, 2035,
 2090

0092.02--the following census blocks:

1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1220, 1221, 1222

0108.05--the following census blocks:

1169, 1174

0110.02--the following census blocks:

1044, 1059, 1061, 1062, 1063

0111.01--the following census blocks:

4045, 4046, 4050

0111.02--the following census blocks:

2030

0115.00--the following census blocks:

1067, 1068, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1102, 1103, 1104

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21434.

Congressional District 34 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 34

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

1810.00, 1813.00, 1814.00, 1815.00, 1816.00, 1831.03, 1831.04, 1832.20, 1832.21, 1832.22, 1833.00, 1834.01, 1834.02, 1835.10, 1835.20, 1836.10, 1836.20, 1837.01, 1837.02, 1838.10, 1838.20, 1851.01, 1851.02, 1852.02, 1852.03, 1852.04, 1853.10, 1853.20, 1861.00, 1862.01, 1862.02, 1862.03, 1863.01, 1863.02, 1864.03, 1864.04, 1925.10, 1925.20, 1926.20, 1976.00, 1977.00, 1990.01, 1991.10, 1991.20, 1992.01, 1992.02, 1993.00, 1994.00, 1997.00, 1998.01, 1998.02, 1999.00, 2011.10, 2011.20, 2012.00, 2013.01, 2013.02, 2014.01,
 2014.02, 2015.01, 2015.03, 2015.04, 2016.01, 2016.02, 2017.00, 2031.00, 2032.00, 2033.00, 2035.00, 2036.01, 2036.02, 2037.10, 2037.20, 2038.00, 2039.00, 2041.10, 2041.20, 2042.00, 2043.00, 2044.10, 2044.20, 2046.00, 2047.00, 2048.10, 2048.20, 2049.10, 2049.20, 2051.10, 2051.20, 2060.20, 2060.50, 2060.51, 2060.52, 2060.53, 2060.54, 2062.01, 2062.02, 2063.01, 2063.02, 2063.03, 2071.01, 2071.02, 2071.03, 2073.04, 2073.05, 2073.06, 2073.07, 2073.08, 2074.00, 2075.01, 2075.02, 2080.01, 2080.02, 2083.01, 2083.02, 2084.01, 2084.02, 2085.01, 2085.02, 2086.10, 2086.20, 2087.10, 2087.20, 2088.01, 2088.02, 2089.02, 2089.03, 2089.04, 2091.03, 2091.04, 2091.05, 2091.06, 2092.01, 2092.02, 2093.00, 2094.01, 2094.02, 2094.03, 2095.10, 2095.20, 2098.10, 2098.20, 2100.10, 2111.21, 2111.22, 2111.23, 2111.24, 2112.01, 2112.02, 2113.10, 2113.20, 2114.10, 2114.20, 2117.03, 2117.04, 2118.02, 2118.03, 2118.04, 2119.10, 2119.21, 2119.22, 2121.01, 2121.02, 2122.02, 2122.03, 2122.04, 2123.03, 2123.04, 2123.05, 2123.06, 2124.10,
 2124.20, 2125.01, 2125.02, 2126.10, 2126.20, 2127.01, 2129.00, 2131.00, 2132.01, 2132.02, 2133.10, 2133.20, 2134.01, 2134.02, 2211.10, 2211.20, 2212.20, 2216.02, 2243.10, 2243.20, 5303.01, 5303.02, 5305.00, 5306.03, 5307.00, 5308.01, 5308.02, 5309.01, 5309.02, 5310.00, 5311.01, 5311.02, 5312.01, 5312.02, 5313.01, 5315.02, 5315.03, 5315.04, 5316.02, 5316.03, 5316.04, 5317.01, 5317.02, 5319.01

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

1831.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013

1864.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000,
 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2010, 2011

1871.02--the following census blocks:

2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024

1872.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1011

1926.10--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003

1927.00--the following census blocks:

2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2012

1957.10--the following census blocks:

3003, 3004, 3005, 3008, 3009

1958.02--the following census blocks:

1007, 1009, 1010, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002,
 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007

1959.03--the following census blocks:

1007

1972.00--the following census blocks:

1020, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000

1990.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2011, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061

2060.10--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020,
 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011

2077.11--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005

2077.12--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013

2115.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013

2117.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1003, 3000, 3007

2127.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 2005

2242.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010

5302.02--the following census blocks:

1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029

5304.00--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3016, 3017, 3018

5313.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009,
 4011

5318.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014

5319.02--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010

9800.10--the following census blocks:

1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1022

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21435.

Congressional District 35 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 35

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

4002.06, 4017.05, 4017.06, 4017.07, 4018.01, 4018.02, 4019.01, 4019.02, 4020.01, 4020.02, 4021.01, 4021.02, 4022.00, 4023.01, 4023.03, 4023.04, 4024.06, 4026.01, 4026.02, 4027.02, 4027.03, 4027.05, 4027.06

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

4002.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1015, 1016, 1020, 1027, 1030, 1031, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1039,
 1040, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072

4002.09--the following census blocks:

2003, 2008, 2009, 2032

4025.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1016, 1017

4028.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005

4088.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018,
 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2050, 2051, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022

4090.00--the following census blocks:

1001

RIVERSIDE

Whole Tracts in Riverside County

0406.11, 0406.17, 0406.19, 0406.20, 0406.21, 0407.01, 0407.02, 0408.06, 0408.07, 0408.08, 0408.09, 0408.12, 0408.13, 0408.14, 0408.15, 0408.16, 0408.21, 0415.00, 0416.01, 0417.03, 0417.04, 0419.06, 0466.01, 0466.02, 0482.00

Partial Tracts in
 Riverside County

0406.03--the following census blocks:

1038, 1039

0406.09--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029,
 4030, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039

0406.16--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2004, 2005, 2008, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011

0406.18--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3065, 3066, 3067,
 3068, 3069, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094

0406.22--the following census blocks:

1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020

0407.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008

0410.04--the following census blocks:

3006, 3012, 3013, 3021, 3022

0414.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1005, 1006

0414.12--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1026, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2032

0416.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026

0417.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005

0418.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003

0418.12--the following census blocks:

1002

0418.13--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

0419.04--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3005, 3013, 3014

0419.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2010

SAN BERNARDINO

Whole Tracts in San Bernardino County

0001.03, 0001.04, 0001.05, 0001.07, 0001.08, 0001.09, 0001.11, 0001.15, 0001.17, 0001.18, 0001.19, 0001.20, 0001.21, 0001.22, 0008.21, 0008.23, 0008.24, 0008.25, 0008.26, 0009.01, 0009.03, 0009.04, 0010.01, 0010.02, 0011.01, 0011.03, 0011.04, 0012.00, 0013.05, 0013.07, 0013.08, 0013.09, 0013.10, 0013.12, 0014.00, 0015.01, 0015.03, 0015.04, 0016.00, 0017.02, 0017.04, 0017.06, 0017.07, 0018.03, 0018.04, 0018.06, 0018.08, 0018.09, 0018.10, 0018.12, 0018.13, 0019.06, 0019.07, 0019.08, 0019.09, 0019.10, 0021.01, 0021.09, 0022.06, 0024.03, 0024.05, 0024.06, 0025.01, 0025.03, 0025.04, 0026.02, 0026.04, 0026.06, 0026.08, 0026.09, 0026.10, 0026.11, 0028.03, 0028.04, 0030.00, 0031.01, 0031.02, 0032.01, 0032.02, 0033.01, 0033.02, 0040.01, 0127.00

Partial Tracts in San Bernardino County

0002.01--the following census
 blocks:

1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2030, 3005

0004.01--the following census blocks:

3007, 3008, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 4008, 4009, 4014, 4016, 4020

0005.04--the following census blocks:

3030, 3031

0017.03--the following census blocks:

1007

0019.11--the following census blocks:

1000, 2000, 3000, 3018

0021.03--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004

0021.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1015

0022.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008

0022.07--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1035

0024.04--the following census blocks:

1004, 1006, 2000, 2003, 2004, 2005

0029.01--the following census blocks:

2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011

0029.02--the following census blocks:

2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 5000, 5001, 5002

0034.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011

0034.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2006, 2007, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006

0034.04--the following census blocks:

2001, 2002, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000

0034.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001

0036.05--the following census blocks:

1001, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2018

0036.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2005, 2006, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008,
 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007

0040.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022

0040.04--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028

0122.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 2013

0122.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1008

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21436.

Congressional District 36 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 36

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

2651.00, 2652.01, 2652.03, 2652.04, 2653.01, 2653.03, 2653.04, 2653.06, 2653.07, 2656.01, 2656.02, 2657.01, 2657.02, 2671.01, 2671.02, 2672.01, 2672.02, 2675.02, 2676.00, 2677.00, 2678.00, 2679.02, 2699.08, 2711.00, 2712.00, 2713.00, 2714.00, 2715.00, 2716.00, 2717.02, 2717.03, 2717.04, 2718.01, 2718.03, 2718.04, 2719.01, 2719.02, 2721.00, 2722.01, 2722.02, 2723.01, 2723.02, 2731.00, 2732.00, 2733.00, 2734.03, 2734.04, 2735.02, 2736.00, 2737.00, 2738.00, 2739.02, 2741.00, 2742.02, 2751.01, 2751.02, 2752.00, 2753.11,
 2753.12, 2753.13, 2754.00, 2755.00, 2756.03, 2756.04, 2756.05, 2760.00, 2764.00, 2765.00, 2766.01, 2766.05, 2766.06, 2770.00, 2771.00, 2781.02, 2933.01, 2933.02, 6200.01, 6200.02, 6201.01, 6201.02, 6202.01, 6203.01, 6203.03, 6203.05, 6204.00, 6205.01, 6205.21, 6205.22, 6206.01, 6206.02, 6207.01, 6207.03, 6207.04, 6208.01, 6208.02, 6209.01, 6209.04, 6210.01, 6210.05, 6211.02, 6211.04, 6212.01, 6212.04, 6213.01, 6213.24, 6213.26, 6214.00, 6505.02, 6506.03, 6507.02, 6510.01, 6510.02, 6511.01, 6511.02, 6512.01, 6512.21, 6512.22, 6513.02, 6513.04, 6514.01, 6514.02, 6700.01, 6700.02, 6700.03, 6701.01, 6701.02, 6702.01, 6702.02, 6703.24, 6703.26, 6703.28, 6704.05, 6704.06, 6704.07, 6704.13, 6704.16, 6704.17, 6704.18, 6705.00, 6706.03, 6706.04, 6707.01, 6707.02, 7006.00, 7007.00, 7008.01, 7008.02, 7009.01, 7009.02, 7010.00, 7012.01, 7012.02, 7013.02, 7013.04, 7014.02, 7015.01, 7015.02, 7016.01, 7016.02, 7017.01, 7017.02, 7018.01, 7018.02, 7019.02, 7020.02, 7021.02, 7022.01, 7022.02, 7023.00, 7028.03, 7029.00,
 9800.13, 9800.30

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

2643.05--the following census blocks:

2012

2655.23--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1008, 2000, 2001

2655.24--the following census blocks:

2013

2673.00--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2001, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004

2675.03--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011

2675.04--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005

2690.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3001, 3002, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005

2693.00--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010

2695.00--the following census blocks:

3001

2699.07--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007

2699.09--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 2002

2766.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

2766.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005

2772.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004

2780.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2022, 2023, 2024

2933.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 2006

2933.06--the following census blocks:

1009, 1018, 1019

2944.21--the following census blocks:

3002

6503.00--the following census blocks:

5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010

6505.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014

6506.06--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011

6506.07--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018

6507.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010,
 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2039

7026.00--the following census blocks:

4020, 4021, 4022, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4038, 4039

7028.02--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2013, 2014, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033

7030.03--the following census blocks:

2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033

9800.28--the following census blocks:

1000, 1061, 1064, 1065, 1068, 1069, 1080, 1081

9902.00--the following census blocks:

0005, 0006, 0007, 0008, 0009, 0010, 0011, 0012, 0013, 0014, 0015, 0016, 0017

9903.00--the following census blocks:

0008, 0009, 0010

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21437.

Congressional District 37 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 37

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

2073.03, 2079.01, 2079.02, 2128.00, 2164.01, 2164.02, 2167.00, 2168.00, 2169.01, 2169.02, 2170.01, 2170.02, 2171.01, 2171.02, 2172.00, 2181.10, 2181.20, 2182.10, 2182.20, 2183.00, 2184.00, 2185.00, 2186.00, 2187.01, 2187.02, 2188.00, 2189.00, 2190.10, 2190.20, 2193.00, 2195.00, 2197.00, 2198.00, 2199.01, 2199.02, 2200.00, 2201.00, 2212.10, 2213.02, 2213.03, 2213.04, 2214.01, 2214.02, 2215.00, 2216.01, 2217.10, 2218.10, 2218.20, 2219.00, 2220.01, 2220.02, 2221.00, 2222.00, 2225.00, 2226.00, 2227.00, 2240.10, 2240.20,
 2244.10, 2244.20, 2246.00, 2247.01, 2247.02, 2260.01, 2260.02, 2264.10, 2264.20, 2267.01, 2267.02, 2270.10, 2270.20, 2281.00, 2282.10, 2282.20, 2283.10, 2283.20, 2284.10, 2284.20, 2285.00, 2286.00, 2287.10, 2287.20, 2288.00, 2289.00, 2291.00, 2292.00, 2293.00, 2294.10, 2294.20, 2311.00, 2312.10, 2312.20, 2313.01, 2313.02, 2314.00, 2315.00, 2316.01, 2316.02, 2316.03, 2317.10, 2317.20, 2318.00, 2319.01, 2319.02, 2321.10, 2321.20, 2322.00, 2323.00, 2324.01, 2324.02, 2325.00, 2326.01, 2326.02, 2327.01, 2327.02, 2328.00, 2340.01, 2340.02, 2342.00, 2343.01, 2343.02, 2345.01, 2345.02, 2346.00, 2347.00, 2348.00, 2349.01, 2349.02, 2351.00, 2352.01, 2352.02, 2360.01, 2361.01, 2361.02, 2362.03, 2362.04, 2362.05, 2362.06, 2364.00, 2371.01, 2371.02, 2372.01, 2372.02, 2373.00, 2374.01, 2374.02, 2375.00, 2376.00, 2377.10, 2377.20, 2378.00, 2379.00, 2381.00, 2383.10, 2384.00, 2392.01, 2392.02, 2393.10, 2393.20, 2393.30, 2395.01, 2395.02, 2396.01, 2396.02, 2397.01, 2398.01, 2398.02, 2679.01, 2691.00, 2696.01, 2696.02,
 2697.00, 2698.00, 2699.03, 2699.05, 2699.06, 2701.01, 2701.02, 2702.00, 2703.00, 7024.00, 7025.01, 7025.02, 7027.00, 7028.01, 7031.00, 7032.00, 9800.38

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

2077.11--the following census blocks:

1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024

2077.12--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005

2127.02--the following census blocks:

1014, 1015, 2010, 2011

2161.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006

2162.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1003, 1004, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010

2242.00--the following census blocks:

2009

2380.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 6011, 6012, 6013, 6014, 6015

2382.00--the
 following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014

2383.20--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005

2397.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009

2400.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021

2400.20--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3007, 3008

2690.00--the following census blocks:

2014, 3000, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019

2693.00--the following census blocks:

1000

2695.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008,
 2009, 2010, 3000, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014

2699.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003

2699.09--the following census blocks:

2003, 2004, 2005

7026.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4023, 4024, 4029, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 6011, 6012, 6013,
 6014, 6015, 6016, 6017, 6018

7028.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1003, 2000, 2011, 2012, 2015

7030.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025

7030.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006,
 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 3000, 3001, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21438.

Congressional District 38 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 38

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

4033.05, 4033.19, 4033.20, 4033.21, 4033.23, 4033.24, 4033.25, 4033.26, 4033.28, 4047.01, 4047.02, 4048.04, 4048.05, 4048.06, 4049.01, 4049.02, 4049.03, 4050.01, 4050.02, 4051.01, 4051.02, 4052.01, 4052.02, 4052.03, 4081.38, 4081.39, 4081.40, 4082.12, 4082.13, 4083.01, 4083.02, 4083.03, 4084.01, 4084.02, 4085.03, 4085.04, 4085.05, 4086.23, 4086.24, 4086.25, 4086.26, 4086.27, 4086.28, 4086.29, 4086.31, 4087.05, 4087.07, 4087.22, 4087.24, 4087.25, 4091.00, 4323.00, 4324.01, 4324.02, 4325.01, 4326.01, 4326.02, 4327.00,
 4328.01, 4328.02, 4331.03, 4332.00, 4333.02, 4333.04, 4333.05, 4333.06, 4333.07, 4334.02, 4334.03, 4335.05, 4335.06, 4338.03, 4338.04, 4339.01, 4339.03, 4340.01, 4340.03, 4340.04, 4341.00, 5001.00, 5002.04, 5003.00, 5004.02, 5004.03, 5004.04, 5005.00, 5006.00, 5007.00, 5008.00, 5009.00, 5300.05, 5300.06, 5301.01, 5301.02, 5302.03, 5302.04, 5320.01, 5320.02, 5321.01, 5321.02, 5322.00, 5323.02, 5323.03, 5323.04, 5334.01, 5334.02, 5334.03, 5336.01, 5336.02, 5336.03, 5337.01, 5337.02, 5337.03, 5338.03, 5338.04, 5338.05, 5338.06, 5343.01, 5343.02, 5344.03, 5344.04, 5344.05, 5344.06, 9800.35

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

4033.16--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010,
 3011, 3012

4033.27--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005

4047.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015

4069.03--the following census blocks:

3000

4070.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 2000, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2012

4070.02--the following census blocks:

1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2023, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051

4076.02--the following census blocks:

4001

4077.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1011

4078.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002,
 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007

4081.33--the following census blocks:

2002

4081.37--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004

4081.41--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3013

4087.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013

4315.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016

4315.02--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011

4321.01--the following census blocks:

1008

4321.02--the following census blocks:

1010, 5009

4325.02--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010,
 2011, 2012

4329.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001

4825.22--the following census blocks:

1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

5002.02--the following census blocks:

5005

5010.01--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016

5010.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007,
 1008, 1009, 1010, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3020, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036

5012.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1009, 1010, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2024, 2027, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2037, 2038

5015.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1011, 1012, 1013

5016.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1025, 1026, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033

5021.00--the
 following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2002, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014

5022.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023

5023.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008,